src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BERN-UCASE-LOAN
                +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
              +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
   +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
        +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
               +Use/Sub:    BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
               +Use/Sub:%:  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
               +Use/Sub:%-  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
               +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
               +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
        +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:    K                  ;
        +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a   K                  ;
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a   RHyph              ; ! Gen is sub
        +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a   K                  ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Use/Sub:    K                  ;
        +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i   K                  ;
        +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as  K                  ;
  +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an  K                  ; !SOUTH
        +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ain K                  ;
           +Ess+Use/Sub:an  K                  ;
!+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde K ;
!+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ain K ;
!+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aigujn K ;


LEXICON BERN-OBL
        +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:       K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:a      K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:a      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:a      K     ;
        +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:       K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:ij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:as     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ain    K     ;
                  +Ess:an     K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:at     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:ajd9   K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:ajd9   K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:ajde   K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:ain    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:aigujn K     ;

LEXICON BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG
        +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:    K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:a   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:a   K     ;
        +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:    K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:as  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ain K     ;
                  +Ess:an  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ain K ;
!+Pl+Com:aigujn K ;


!The BERN plural forms are different from CNAME because there is
!a form Peraid from Per in coprus.


! TODO: fix!
LEXICON BETFAGE-fem
 :e ACCRA-fem ;

LEXICON BETFAGE-mal
 :e ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON BETFAGE-plc
 :e ACCRA-plc ;



LEXICON HEIM-sur   !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            HEIMDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON HEIM-LOAN-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
         +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  BERNDECL-LOAN    ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>  HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
                +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH        ;

LEXICON HEIM-plc !only for -heim:-heimas/-heim:-heimmas
         +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>  HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
                        :%>a PLACELASH        ;


LEXICON HEIMDECL
                           HEIM-DC        ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i  ACCRA-I        ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-OBL      ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@   MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-IICASE   ;

LEXICON HEIMDECL_PLC-ORG
                           HEIM-DC           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i  ACCRA-I           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@   MARJA-SHORTGEN    ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ma ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON HEIM-DC
   HEIM-NE ;

LEXICON HEIM-NE
              +Sg+Nom:   K     ;
            +CmpN/SgN:   RHyph ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:   RProp ;
                 +Ess:an K     ;

LEXICON SUND-sur !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            SUNDDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SUND-LOAN-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            BERNDECL-LOAN    ;
            +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>            SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2  ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3  ; !

LEXICON SUND-plc !only for -sund:-sundas/-sund:-sunddas
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
            +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>            SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG ; !
         @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC2  ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DenominalAdjsC3  ; !


LEXICON SUNDDECL
                           HEIM-DC        ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i  ACCRA-I        ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-OBL      ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@   MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-IICASE   ;


LEXICON SUNDDECL_PLC-ORG
                           HEIM-DC           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@i  ACCRA-I           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@   MARJA-SHORTGEN    ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@da ACCRA-IICASE ;

! From MALIS
LEXICON DUORTNUS-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>              DUORTNUSDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@X4 #            ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
                    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;
         @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2      ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3      ; !


LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
   DUORTNUS-OBL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
   DUORTNUS-OBL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:X4       K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7       RHyph ; !
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8       RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:X4       RHyph ;
                  +Ess:X4in     K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:X2a      K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2       K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2       RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:X2a      RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:X2a      K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2       K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:X2ij     K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:X2is     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X2in     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:X2ijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:X2at     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:X2ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:X2ijd    K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda  K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:X2ijn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:X2ijguin K     ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-OBL_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:X4    K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X7    RHyph ; !
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8    RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:X4    RHyph ;
                  +Ess:X4in  K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:X2a   K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2    K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2    RHyph ;
             +CmpN/SgG:X2a   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:X2a   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2    K     ; !
               +Sg+Ill:X2ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:X2is  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X2in  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:X2ijn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:X2ijguin K ;
