src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Bajemusluoppal:Bajemus^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bealljeduottar:Beallje^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Biehtáragielas:Biehtára^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bienne% Juhána% maras:Bienne% Juhána% marras DUORTNUS-plc ;
Biggeluoppal:Bigge^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Birkkoluoppal:Birkko^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bohtal:Bohttal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Buoiddesguolluoppal:Buoiddes^guol^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Buođđoluoppal:Buođđo^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Skáiddeduottar:Skáidde^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Báktesavvonlánjas:Bákte^savvon^látnjas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bállasduottar:Bállas^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bállásluoppal:Bállás^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Bárttán:Bárttán9 DUORTNUS-mal ;
Bávvalluoppal:Bávval^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Dappal:Dabbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Davánjunis:Davá^njunnis DUORTNUS-plc ; !Turi, muitalus...
Divgoaiseaibbuš:Divg^oai^seaj'buš DUORTNUS-plc ;
Duolva% Duottar:Duolva% Duoddar DUORTNUS-org ;
Duomás:Duopmás DUORTNUS-mal ;
Duortnus+Use/Sub:Duordnos DUORTNUS-plc ; !
Dápmotluoppal:Dápmot^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Fávrrosluoppal:Fávrros^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gamajohnjálmmeluoppal:Gama^joh^njálmme^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gazzaboahkánluoppal:Gazza^boahkán^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Geađgeborgielas:Geađge^bor^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gieddenjunis:Giedde^njunnis DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gieppošduottar:Gieppoš^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !Turi, muitalus...
Goahppelašjávrreluoppal:Goahppelaš^jávrre^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Goasteluoppal:Goaste^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gomufanas:Gomu^fatnas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Govsujávrreanan:Govsu^jávrr^eatnam DUORTNUS-plc ;
Guhtomatluoppal:Guhtomat^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Guoddašluoppal:Guoddaš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Guorbamaras:Guorba^marras DUORTNUS-plc ;
Guossa-Báhteduottar:Guossa-Báhte^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Guovllas:Guov'las DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gussaluoppal:Gussa^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gálddašluoppal:Gálddaš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Gálgoguoikkadappal:Gálgo^guoikka^dabbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Gánedappal:Gáne^dabbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Gárdemaras:Gárde^marras DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Haŋŋáluoppal:Haŋŋá^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Hoanttas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Hánasbierluoppal:Hánas^bier^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Idjavuonduottar:Idja^vuon^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Jerestanluoppal:Jerestan^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Johannasurttas:Johannasur'tas DUORTNUS-obj ;
Gáhkkormaras:Gáhkkor^marras DUORTNUS-plc ;
Justiisaministtar:Justiisa^minis'tar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Lohkkejárluoppal:Lohkke^jár^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Luossaluoppal:Luossa^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Láhpoluoppal+Use/Sub:Láhppo^luoppal DUORTNUS-plc ; !
Láŋas:Lákŋas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Muotkeduottar:Muotke^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Máttaluoppal:Mátta^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Nanaš:Nannaš DUORTNUS-obj ;
Nirvejohgielas:Nirve^joh^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Njoammeloaivveseaibbuš:Njoammel^oaivve^seaj'buš DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Nállogoahduottar+Use/Sub:Nállo^goat^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !
Oaivvošluoppal:Oaivvoš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Orus:Orrus DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ovnnusluoppal:Ovnnus^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Riehtimaras:Riehti^marras DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Riihmagállis:Riihma^gál'lis DUORTNUS-ani ;
Roahkálánjas:Roahká^látnjas DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Ruotoduottar:Ruoto^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Ráippis:Ráj'pis DUORTNUS-plc ;
Rávdomaras:Rávdo^marras DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Sieiddenjunis:Sieidde^njunnis DUORTNUS-plc ;
Sielu% Dálkkas:Sielu% Dál'kas DUORTNUS-org ;
Skierrefális:Skierre^fállis DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Sovgesjávrreanan:Sovges^jávrr^eatnam DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Stuorragoahtemaras:Stuorra^goahte^marras DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Suovasgielas:Suovas^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Sámetluoppal:Sámet^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Vahttáluoppal:Vahttá^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Viercagálmaras:Vierca^gál^marras DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Vuomagielas:Vuoma^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Váišluoppal:Váiš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Váljoht`% Biras:Vál^joht`% Birras DUORTNUS-org ;
Áhkojárgielas:Áhko^jár^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Ánddar:Án'dar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Ánddašluoppal:Ánddaš^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ávželuoppal:Ávže^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Čeavrresgielas:Čeavrres^giellas DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Čohkavárseaibbuš:Čohka^vár^seaj'buš DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
Čáhcevuomuš:Čáhce^vuopmuš DUORTNUS-plc ; !FIN
